Illinois, session 104th, HB3132.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by adding 5Section 50-80 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/50-80 new)7    Sec. 50-80. Tuition reimbursement program. An individual 8licensed under this Act may apply for a program that provides a 9full tuition reimbursement to individuals who: (i) attended 10and graduated from an education program based in the State; 11and (ii) commit to working in a safety-net hospital in the 12State for at least 5 years. As used in this Section, 13"safety-net hospital" means a hospital identified by the 14Department of Healthcare and Family Services under Section 155-5e.1 of the Illinois Public Aid Code.